Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.520

Investment of corporate funds.

A metropolitan municipal corporation shall have the power to invest its funds held in reserves or sinking funds or any such funds which are not required for immediate disbursement, in any investments in which a city is authorized to invest, as provided in RCW 35.39.030.

[ 1993 c 240 s 17; 1965 c 7 s 35.58.520. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 52.]